Utah statutes.
58-9-503.   Penalty for unlawful conduct.
(1)  A person who violates the unlawful conduct provisions defined in
Subsections 58-9-501(1) through (4) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(2)  A person who violates the unlawful conduct provision defined in
Subsection 58-9-501(5) may be prosecuted under Title 76, Chapter 6, Part 4,
Theft.
